Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202055-428
Witness; failure to appear; procedure.

(1) Any person not subject to the code who:

(a) Has been duly subpoenaed to appear as a witness before a court-martial, military commission, court of inquiry, or any other military court or board, or before any military or civil officer designated to take a deposition to be read in evidence before such a court, commission, or board;

(b) Has been duly paid or tendered the fees of a witness at the rates allowed to witnesses attending the district courts of the State of Nebraska and mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176 for state employees; and

(c) Willfully neglects or refuses to appear, or refuses to qualify as a witness or to testify or to produce any evidence which that person may have been legally subpoenaed to produce, is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

(2) The Attorney General of Nebraska, upon the certification of the facts to him or her by the military court, commission, or board shall file an information against and prosecute any person violating this section.

(3) The fees and mileage of witnesses shall be advanced or paid out of the appropriations for the compensation of witnesses.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 28, p. 1566;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 55;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 97;

Laws 2016, LB754, § 14.